Florida, session 2026, SB1036.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 15 1012.34, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 16 1012.34âPersonnel evaluation procedures and criteria.â 17 (3)âEVALUATION PROCEDURES AND CRITERIA.âInstructional 18 personnel and school administrator performance evaluations must 19 be based upon the performance of students assigned to their 20 classrooms or schools, as provided in this section. Pursuant to 21 this section, a school districtâs performance evaluation system 22 is not limited to basing unsatisfactory performance of 23 instructional personnel and school administrators solely upon 24 student performance, but may include other criteria to evaluate 25 instructional personnel and school administratorsâ performance, 26 or any combination of student performance and other criteria. 27 Evaluation procedures and criteria must comply with, but are not 28 limited to, the following: 29 (a)âA performance evaluation must be conducted for each 30 employee at least once a year, except that a classroom teacher, 31 as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a), excluding substitute teachers, 32 who is newly hired by the district school board must be observed 33 and evaluated at least twice in the first year of teaching in 34 the school district. The performance evaluation must be based 35 upon sound educational principles and contemporary research in 36 effective educational practices. The evaluation criteria must 37 include: 38 1.âPerformance of students.âAt least one-third of a 39 performance evaluation must be based upon data and indicators of 40 student performance, as determined by each school district. This 41 portion of the evaluation must include growth or achievement 42 data of the teacherâs students or, for a school administrator, 43 the students attending the school over the course of at least 3 44 years. If less than 3 years of data are available, the years for 45 which data are available must be used. The proportion of growth 46 or achievement data may be determined by instructional 47 assignment. 48 2.âInstructional practice.âFor instructional personnel, at 49 least one-third of the performance evaluation must be based upon 50 instructional practice. Evaluation criteria used when annually 51 observing classroom teachers, as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a), 52 excluding substitute teachers, must include indicators based 53 upon each of the Florida Educator Accomplished Practices adopted 54 by the State Board of Education. 55 a.âFor instructional personnel who are not classroom 56 teachers or certified school counselors, evaluation criteria 57 must be based upon indicators of the Florida Educator 58 Accomplished Practices and may include specific job expectations 59 related to student support. 60 b.âFor certified school counselors, evaluation criteria 61 must be based upon indicators of the Florida School Counseling 62 Standards adopted by the State Board of Education. 63 c.âThis section does not preclude a school administrator 64 from visiting and observing classroom teachers throughout the 65 school year for purposes of providing mentorship, training, 66 instructional feedback, or professional learning. 67 3.âInstructional leadership.âFor school administrators, at 68 least one-third of the performance evaluation must be based on 69 instructional leadership. Evaluation criteria for instructional 70 leadership must include indicators based upon each of the 71 leadership standards adopted by the State Board of Education 72 under s. 1012.986, including performance measures related to the 73 effectiveness of classroom teachers in the school, the 74 administratorâs appropriate use of evaluation criteria and 75 procedures, recruitment and retention of effective and highly 76 effective classroom teachers, improvement in the percentage of 77 instructional personnel evaluated at the highly effective or 78 effective level, and other leadership practices that result in 79 student learning growth. The system may include a means to give 80 parents and instructional personnel an opportunity to provide 81 input into the administratorâs performance evaluation. 82 4.âOther indicators of performance.âFor instructional 83 personnel and school administrators, the remainder of a 84 performance evaluation may include, but is not limited to, 85 professional and job responsibilities as recommended by the 86 State Board of Education or identified by the district school 87 board and, for instructional personnel, peer reviews, 88 objectively reliable survey information from students and 89 parents based on teaching practices that are consistently 90 associated with higher student achievement, and other valid and 91 reliable measures of instructional practice. 92 Section 2.âPresent subsection (6) of section 1012.55, 93 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (7), and a new 94 subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 95 1012.55âPositions for which certificates required.â 96 (6)âA person who is seeking employment as a school 97 counselor is exempt from the educator certification requirements 98 in s. 1012.56(2)(g) and (i). Such exemption does not preclude a 99 school district from requiring a certified school counselor to 100 satisfy the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(g) and (i) as a 101 condition of employment. 102 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.